New York, session 2025-2026, A332.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 11 of section 400.00 of the 2 penal law, as added by chapter 371 of the laws of 2022, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (c) In any instance in which a person's license is suspended or 5 revoked under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subdivision, such person 6 shall surrender such license to the appropriate licensing official and 7 any and all firearms, rifles, [or] shotguns, antique firearms, black 8 powder rifles, black powder shotguns, or muzzle-loading firearms, owned 9 or possessed by such person shall be surrendered to an appropriate law 10 enforcement agency as provided in subparagraph (f) of paragraph one of 11 subdivision a of section 265.20 of this chapter. In the event such 12 license, firearm, shotgun, [or] rifle, antique firearm, black powder 13 rifle, black powder shotgun, or muzzle-loading firearm is not surren- 14 dered, such items shall be removed and declared a nuisance and any 15 police officer or peace officer acting pursuant to [his or her] such 16 officer's special duties is authorized to remove any and all such weap- 17 ons. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately, and shall apply to 19 suspensions or revocations of licenses on or after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01059-01-5